Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5265.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "veterans service animal grant program act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs. (b) "Fund" means the veterans service animal fund created in section 5. (c) "Program" means the veterans service animal grant program created in section 3. (d) "Service animal" means that term as defined in 28 CFR 36.104. (e) "Veteran" means that term as defined in section 1 of 1965 PA 190, MCL 35.61. Sec. 3. (1) The veterans service animal grant program is created to provide grants to veterans to assist with the cost of obtaining a service animal. The department shall do all of the following: (a) Administer the program. (b) Provide grants to eligible veterans under this act. (c) Establish an application form and application timetable for eligible veterans to apply for grants under this act. (2) A veteran is eligible for a grant under this act if the veteran meets all of the following requirements: (a) Has been diagnosed with post-traumatic stress as a result of service in the armed forces. (b) Has been matched with a service animal from a nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code, 26 USC 501. (c) Any additional eligibility standards promulgated under subsection (3). (3) The department may promulgate rules to implement and administer this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. The rules may include additional standards of eligibility for veterans to receive grants under this act. Sec. 5. (1) The veterans service animal fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) Awarding grants under this act. (b) Administering the grant program.